Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5372.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-19-16.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-19 entitled "Relief of
Injured and Deceased Fire Fighters and Police Officers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-19-16.1. Presumption for heart disease and hypertension.
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, any
firefighter or police officer, as defined in § 45-19-1, who is unable to perform the duties required
thereof because of an impairment of health caused by heart disease, stroke, or hypertension is
presumed to have suffered an in-the-line-of duty injury/disability, unless the contrary can be proven
by clear and convincing evidence; and the firefighter or police officer shall be entitled to all benefits
provided for in chapters 19, 21, 21.2, and 21.3 of this title.
(b) This presumption shall not apply to firefighters or police officers hired after July 1,
2023 2025, in the following situations:
(1) If a physical examination was conducted at the time the firefighter or police officer was
hired and the examination revealed that person was suffering from heart disease or hypertension.
(2) If the firefighter or police officer had regularly or habitually used tobacco products
during the five (5) years prior to any diagnosis of heart disease or hypertension or suffering a stroke.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001305
========